Utah statutes.
70A-2a-508.   Lessee's remedies.
(1)  If a lessor fails to deliver the goods in conformity to the lease
contract as provided in Section 70A-2a-509 or repudiates the lease contract as
provided in Section 70A-2a-402, or a lessee rightfully rejects the goods as
provided in Section 70A-2a-509 or justifiably revokes acceptance of the goods
as provided in Section 70A-2a-517, then with respect to any goods involved,
and with respect to all of the goods if under an installment lease contract
the value of the whole lease contract is substantially impaired as provided in
Section 70A-2a-510, the lessor is in default under the lease contract and the
lessee may:
(a)  cancel the lease contract as provided in Subsection 70A-2a-505(1);
(b)  recover so much of the rent and security as has been paid and is just
under the circumstances;
(c)  cover and recover damages as to all goods affected whether or not they
have been identified to the lease contract as provided in Sections 70A-2a-518
and 70A-2a-520, or recover damages for nondelivery as provided in Sections
70A-2a-519 and 70A-2a-520; or
(d)  exercise any other rights or pursue any other remedies provided in the
lease contract.
(2)  If a lessor fails to deliver the goods in conformity to the lease
contract or repudiates the lease contract, the lessee may also:
(a)  if the goods have been identified, recover them as provided in Section
70A-2a-522; or
(b)  in a proper case, obtain specific performance or replevy the goods as
provided in Section 70A-2a-521.
(3)  If a lessor is in default under the lease contract, the lessee may
exercise the rights and pursue the remedies provided for in the lease
contract, which may include the right to cancel the lease, and in Section 70A-
2a-519.
(4)  If a lessor has breached a warranty, whether express or implied, the
lessee may recover damages as provided in Subsection 70A-2a-519(4).
(5)  On rightful rejection or justifiable revocation of acceptance, a lessee
has a security interest in goods in the lessee's possession or control for any
rent and security that has been paid and any expenses reasonably incurred in
their inspection, receipt, transportation, and care and custody and may hold
those goods and dispose of them in good faith and in a commercially reasonable
manner, subject to the provisions of Subsection 70A-2a-527(5).
(6)  Subject to the provisions of Section 70A-2a-407, a lessee, on notifying
the lessor of the lessee's intention to do so, may deduct all or any part of
the damages resulting from any default under the lease contract from any part
of the rent still due under the same lease contract.
